Illinois, session 104th, HB1832.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Central Management Services 5Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6changing Section 405-315 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 405/405-315)  (was 20 ILCS 405/67.24)8    Sec. 405-315. Management of State buildings and other real 9properties; security force; fees. 10    (a) To manage, operate, maintain, and preserve from waste 11the State buildings, facilities, structures, grounds, or other 12real properties, including, without limitation, the real 13properties property transferred to the Department under 14Section 405-415, including, without limitation, the State 15buildings listed below, and to grant easements and accept 16easements with respect to those properties, on such terms and 17conditions that in the judgment of the Director are in the best 18interests of the State. The Department may rent portions of 19these and other State buildings when in the judgment of the 20Director those leases or subleases will be in the best 21interests of the State. The leases or subleases shall not 22exceed 5 years unless a greater term is specifically 23authorized.  HB1832 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 06301 BDA 16336 b1    a. Peoria Regional Office Building 2        5415 North University 3        Peoria, Illinois  61614 4    b. Springfield Regional Office Building 5        4500 South 6th Street 6        Springfield, Illinois  62703 7    c. Champaign Regional Office Building 8        2125 South 1st Street 9        Champaign, Illinois  61820 10    d. Illinois State Armory Building 11        124 East Adams 12        Springfield, Illinois  62706 13    e. Marion Regional Office Building 14        2209 West Main Street 15        Marion, Illinois  62959 16    f. Kenneth Hall Regional State Office 17        Building 18        #10 Collinsville Avenue 19        East St. Louis, Illinois  62201 20    g. Rockford Regional Office Building 21        4402 North Main Street 22        P.O. Box 915 23        Rockford, Illinois  61105 24    h. State of Illinois Building 25        160 North LaSalle 26        Chicago, Illinois  60601 HB1832 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 06301 BDA 16336 b1    i. Office and Laboratory Building 2        2121 West Taylor Street 3        Chicago, Illinois  60602 4    j. Central Computer Facility 5        201 West Adams 6        Springfield, Illinois  62706 7    k. Elgin Office Building 8        595 South State Street 9        Elgin, Illinois  60120 10    l. (Blank). James R. Thompson Center 11        Bounded by Lake, Clark, Randolph and 12        LaSalle Streets 13        Chicago, Illinois 14    m. The following buildings located within the Chicago 15        Medical Center District: 16        1. Lawndale Day Care Center 17        2929 West 19th Street 18        2. Edwards Center 19        2020 Roosevelt Road 20        3. Illinois Center for 21        Rehabilitation and Education 22        1950 West Roosevelt Road and 1151 South Wood Street 23        4. Department of Children and 24        Family Services District Office 25        1026 South Damen 26        5. The William Heally School HB1832 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 06301 BDA 16336 b1        1731 West Taylor 2        6. Administrative Office Building 3        1100 South Paulina Street 4        7. Metro Children and Adolescents Center 5        1601 West Taylor Street 6    n. E.J. "Zeke" Giorgi Center 7        200 Wyman Street 8        Rockford, Illinois 9    o. Suburban North Facility 10        9511 Harrison 11        Des Plaines, Illinois 12    p. The following buildings located within the Revenue 13        Center in Springfield: 14        1. State Property Control Warehouse 15        11th & Ash 16        2. Illinois State Museum Research & Collections 17        Center 18        1011 East Ash Street 19    q. Effingham Regional Office Building 20        401 Industrial Drive 21        Effingham, Illinois 22    r. The Communications Center 23        120 West Jefferson 24        Springfield, Illinois 25    s. Portions or all of the basement and 26        ground floor of the HB1832 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 06301 BDA 16336 b1        State of Illinois Building 2        160 North LaSalle 3        Chicago, Illinois 60601 4    t. 115 South LaSalle Street, Chicago, Illinois 5may be leased or subleased to persons, firms, partnerships, 6associations, or individuals for terms not to exceed 15 years 7when in the judgment of the Director those leases or subleases 8will be in the best interests of the State.9    Portions or all of the commercial space, which includes 10the sub-basement, storage mezzanine, concourse, and ground and 11second floors of the12        James R. Thompson Center 13        Bounded by Lake, Clark, Randolph and LaSalle Streets 14        Chicago, Illinois15may be leased or subleased to persons, firms, partnerships, 16associations, or individuals for terms not to exceed 15 years 17subject to renewals when in the judgment of the Director those 18leases or subleases will be in the best interests of the State.19    The Director is authorized to rent portions of the above 20described facilities to persons, firms, partnerships, 21associations, or individuals for terms not to exceed 30 days 22when those leases or subleases will not interfere with State 23usage of the facility. This authority is meant to supplement 24and shall not in any way be interpreted to restrict the 25Director's ability to make portions of the State of Illinois 26Building and the James R. Thompson Center available for   HB1832 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 06301 BDA 16336 b1long-term commercial leases or subleases.2    Notwithstanding the provisions above, the Department of 3Children and Family Services and the Department of Human 4Services (as successor to the Department of Rehabilitation 5Services and the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 6Disabilities) shall determine the allocation of space for 7direct recipient care in their respective facilities. The 8Department of Central Management Services shall consult with 9the affected agency in the allocation and lease of surplus 10space in these facilities. Potential lease arrangements shall 11not endanger the direct recipient care responsibilities in 12these facilities.13    (b) To appoint, subject to the Personnel Code, persons to 14be members of a police and security force. Members of the 15security force shall be peace officers when performing duties 16pursuant to this Section and as such shall have all of the 17powers possessed by policemen in cities and sheriffs, 18including the power to make arrests on view or issue citations 19for violations of State statutes or city or county ordinances, 20except that in counties of more than 1,000,000 population, any 21powers created by this subsection shall be exercised only (i) 22when necessary to protect the property, personnel, or 23interests of the Department or any State agency for whom the 24Department manages, operates, or maintains property or (ii) 25when specifically requested by appropriate State or local law 26enforcement officials, and except that within counties of   HB1832 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 06301 BDA 16336 b11,000,000 or less population, these powers shall be exercised 2only when necessary to protect the property, personnel, or 3interests of the State of Illinois and only while on property 4managed, operated, or maintained by the Department.5    Nothing in this subsection shall be construed so as to 6make it conflict with any provisions of, or rules promulgated 7under, the Personnel Code.8    (c) To charge reasonable fees for the lease, rental, use, 9or occupancy of State facilities managed, operated, or 10maintained by the Department. All moneys collected under this 11Section shall be deposited in a revolving fund in the State 12treasury known as the Facilities Management Revolving Fund. 13    (d) (Blank). Provisions of this Section relating to the 14James R. Thompson Center are subject to the provisions of 15Section 7.4 of the State Property Control Act.16(Source: P.A. 93-19, eff. 6-20-03; 93-839, eff. 7-30-04; 1794-91, eff. 7-1-05.)